Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Operation and Management of Local Correctional Facilities
441.115.
Jail staff training program — Jailer’s training expense allowance — Eligibility for allowance.

For the purpose of raising the level of competence of jailers and jail personnel, the department shall maintain a jail staff training program to provide training for jailers and jail personnel consistent with the standards promulgated pursuant to KRS

441.055

and shall keep records of jailers and jail personnel who satisfactorily complete basic and annual continuing education. The training program shall include training on communicable diseases. A curriculum advisory committee composed of jailers, their representatives, and recognized professionals in the field of jail administration shall advise the department concerning the training needs of jailers and jail personnel. The jail staff training program shall be directed and staffed by knowledgeable persons who have sufficient experience, training, and education in jail operations. The department shall not charge a fee for training jailers, their deputies, or jailers-elect.

Beginning in August, 1982, each jailer shall receive an expense allowance to help defray the costs of his participation in the jail staff training program. The expense allowance shall be in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) per month payable out of the State Treasury. Expense allowance payments shall be discontinued if the jailer fails to satisfactorily complete annual continuing training. Expense allowance payments shall be resumed following a discontinuance for failure to satisfactorily complete basic or annual training only upon the jailer’s satisfactory completion of the training.

The allowance authorized in subsections (2) and (4) of this section shall be considered as operating expenses of the jailer’s office and shall not be considered as part of his compensation. Jailers shall not be required to keep records verifying the expenditures from the allowance provided by the state.

In order to receive the expense allowance for their first year in office, jailers who have been elected to office for the first time, shall, before taking office, successfully complete a training program designed for new jailers and conducted by the personnel of the jail staff training program. This provision shall not apply if the jailer-elect is ill and unable to complete the training before taking office. In such cases, the jailer-elect shall successfully complete a new jailer training program during his first year in office in order to receive the expense allowance. The county or urban-county government in which the jailer-elect serves shall pay out of the jail budget, once he takes office, all necessary and reasonable travel expenses incurred by the jailer-elect in attending the new jailer training program.

All jailers shall successfully complete the training required. If a jailer does not successfully complete the required training within the time specified, he or she shall not receive the expense allowance specified in subsection (2) of this section until he or she successfully completes the required training.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 12, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 141, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 415, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 436, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 443, § 34, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 121, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 604, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 652, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 324, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 126, § 5, effective June 24, 2015.

441.120.
Place prisoners to work — County judge/executive to designate. [Repealed.]

441.125.
Working of prisoners at community-service-related projects — Written policy — Prisoner’s status not employment.

As used in this section, “community-service-related project” means a project involving work for:

The Commonwealth or an agency of the Commonwealth;

A county, urban-county, charter county, city, special district, or an agency of any of these entities; or

A nonprofit, charitable, or service organization in projects that serve a public purpose.

Work on a community-service-related project shall not confer private benefit on a person except as may be incidental to the public benefit.

Each jailer shall write a policy governing prisoners working on community-service-related projects, which shall be submitted to the fiscal court for approval. The written policy shall state at a minimum:

Which type of prisoner, if any, shall be assigned to which type of work, taking into account the physical and mental abilities of prisoners and security of the jail and the general public;

That no prisoner shall be assigned to unduly hazardous work that would endanger the life or health of the prisoner or others; and

That any prisoner may, for a valid medical reason, decline to work on community-service-related projects. No prisoner shall be punished or otherwise penalized for this refusal.

A prisoner shall not begin work on a particular community-service-related project without the approval of the director of the relevant entity referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section, or the director’s designee.

Participation in community-service-related projects shall not be deemed employment for any purpose, and a prisoner shall not be deemed an employee or agent of the entity for which he or she performs the community service work.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 428, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 384, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2018 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

441.127.
Service credits for work in community service program or within jail, for receipt of GED or high school diploma, for participation in drug treatment program, for exceptionally meritorious service, or for good behavior — Withdrawal of earned credits for misconduct.

The jailer or correctional services department shall grant sentence credits to inmates confined in the county jail on conviction of misdemeanor charges.

Credit, if granted, shall be uniform and shall be based on the following:

For labor performed without the jail in a community service program or within the jail for the maintenance of the jail or for the operation of jail services such as food service:

For every eight (8) full hours of work, one (1) sentence credit shall be earned; and

For every five (5) of sentence credits earned, one (1) day of the sentence to be served by the inmate shall be deducted;

For successfully receiving a general equivalency diploma or a high school diploma, a service credit of ninety (90) days shall be earned;

For each day an inmate participates in a drug treatment program or other evidence-based program approved by the department, a service credit of one (1) day shall be earned;

For performing exceptionally meritorious service, performing duties of outstanding importance in connection with the jail’s operations and programs, or performing acts of exceptional service during times of emergency, an amount not to exceed seven (7) days per act shall be earned, to be determined by the jailer or chief executive of the jail for the conduct of the inmate; and

For good behavior, an amount not to exceed ten (10) days shall be earned for each month served, to be determined by the jailer or chief executive of the jail for the conduct of the inmate.

Sentence credits shall be deducted from the maximum expiration date of the sentence.

If an inmate violates the rules of the jail or engages in other misconduct the jailer or correctional services department may withdraw sentence credits earned by the inmate. The jailer or correctional services department shall maintain a list of offenses and penalties for the ten (10) most common offenses and rule violations.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 57, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2016 ch. 101, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 115, § 11, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018). Pursuant to
2018 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 12, that Act shall be known as the Women's Dignity in the Justice System Act. This statute was amended in Section 11 of that Act.

441.130.
Cost of keeping working prisoners — Who pays — Housing for work crews. [Repealed.]

441.135.
Canteen for prisoners — Use of profits — Books of accounts — Allowable expenditures — Jail canteen account balance — Calculation.

The jailer may maintain a canteen for the benefit of prisoners lodged in the jail and may assign such jail employees and prisoners to operate the canteen as are necessary for efficient operation.

All profits from the canteen shall be used:

For the benefit and to enhance the well-being of the prisoners; or

To enhance safety and security within the jail.

The jailer shall keep books of accounts of all receipts and disbursements from the canteen and shall annually report to the county treasurer on the canteen account.

Allowable expenditures from a canteen account shall include but not be limited to recreational, vocational, and medical purposes.

Except in counties containing an urban-county government or a consolidated local government, in order to ensure adequate, ongoing funding of jail canteen accounts, beginning July 1, 2007, and on the first day of each fiscal year thereafter, the jail canteen account balance shall at least equal the following amounts based on the average daily inmate population of the jail:

300 prisoners or more . . . . . $6,000

200 to 299 prisoners . . . . . $4,000

100 to 199 prisoners . . . . . $2,000

99 or fewer prisoners . . . . . $1,000

For purposes of calculating the amount to be transferred to the jail canteen account, the average daily number of inmates shall be equal to the average daily inmate population of the jail in the immediately preceding fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 171, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 147, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 7, § 1, effective March 2, 2018.

441.137.
Balance in inmate account or prisoner canteen account — Return of balance — Abandoned moneys.

For any moneys in an inmate account or prisoner canteen account of a jail that are not returned to a prisoner at the time he or she is released from the jail, the jailer shall transmit a check for the balance of the moneys by first class mail to the released prisoner at his or her last known address. If the check is returned as undeliverable, then the jailer shall attempt to contact the prisoner at a telephone number on file, if any, to arrange the return of the moneys. If the moneys are not claimed after the jailer fulfills the requirements of this subsection, the moneys shall be presumed abandoned after one (1) year after the date the check is mailed or, if an attempt to call is made, the date of the phone call.

Any abandoned moneys as set out in subsection (1) of this section shall, if in a prisoner account, be transferred into the canteen account if these are two (2) different accounts, or shall remain in the canteen account and be available for the purposes set out in KRS

441.135

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 32, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

441.140.
Rules governing working prisoners. [Repealed.]

441.141.
Voluntary chaplain program.

Each local jailer is encouraged to work with local religious leaders to provide a voluntary chaplain program.

An inmate shall be allowed at least one (1) visit per week by a minister, priest, or rabbi of the inmate’s choice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 132, effective July 15, 1998.

441.145.
Access to religious publications or instructional materials.

Subject to restrictions for violations of rules, an inmate of a facility operated by or under contract to a local jail who requests religious publications or other religious instructional materials may receive them provided:

They have been purchased by or donated to the inmate; or

Donated to the institution for use by inmates; and

Do not constitute a threat to the security of the institution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 134, effective July 15, 1998.

441.146.
Operation of reentry center
for eligible inmates.

A local correctional facility, jail, or regional jail may, with the approval of the Department of Corrections, operate a reentry center. Reentry centers established pursuant to this section shall:

Employ a program coordinator responsible for oversight of the reentry center;

Offer residents at least one (1) vocational training program approved by the Department of Corrections;

Offer residents at least two (2) other evidence-based programs approved by the Department of Corrections;

Review each participant’s case with a certified alcohol and drug counselor as defined in KRS

309.080

;

Require residents to participate in family outreach and community involvement programs;

Require residents to seek or maintain employment in the community. The reentry center shall require ten percent (10%) of the resident’s income to be deposited into a savings account, shall require fifteen percent (15%) of the resident’s income to be directed to payment of restitution if applicable, and may charge each resident a fee of not more than twenty percent (20%) of the resident’s income; and

Report data as required by the Department of Corrections in order to allow evaluation of the effectiveness of the reentry center.

A person is eligible for placement in a reentry center if he or she has less than twelve (12) months until the expected expiration of his or her sentence and is:

A state inmate eligible for placement in a jail pursuant to KRS

532.100

;

A Class B felon who is classified as low risk by the Department of Corrections; or

A county inmate in the jail operated by the political subdivision which operates the reentry center.

Residents may be assigned to a reentry center by:

Administrative classification by the Department of Corrections;

Administrative decision of the jailer for inmates of the jail;

The court, as an alternative sentence; or

The Parole Board, as a condition of parole or as a sanction for violation of conditions of parole.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 88, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 109, § 8, effective April 24, 2020.

441.148.
Administrative regulations prescribing standards for operation of reentry centers.

The Department of Corrections shall, by administrative regulation, establish standards for the operation of reentry centers established pursuant to KRS

441.146

.

The Department of Corrections shall utilize data reported by the reentry centers pursuant to KRS

441.146

to analyze the effectiveness of the reentry centers in reducing recidivism and the engagement of residents in employment and in the community.

Placement of inmates in reentry centers by the Department of Corrections or the Parole Board shall prioritize placement in higher-performing centers, as determined by the Department of Corrections.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 158, § 89, effective June 29, 2017.

441.150.
Managers and guards for work crews. [Repealed.]

441.160.
Prisoners transferred to workhouse — Procedure. [Repealed.]

441.170.
Capias pro fine — Persons arrested on may be delivered to workhouse. [Repealed.]

441.180.
Credit allowed on fine when prisoner works — Work hours — Release of prisoners. [Repealed.]

441.190.
Prisoner not worked — Credit allowed on fine. [Repealed.]

441.200.
Disposition of prisoners — Jailer to report. [Repealed.]

441.205.
Workhouse or penal farm in county containing city of first class. [Repealed.]